Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 33. School Safety and Discipline.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 270 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 789 et seq.

Coverage and exceptions under student accident policy. 74 ALR2d 1253.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accident occurring during school athletic events. 35 ALR3d 725.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injuries caused by acts of fellow students. 36 ALR3d 330.

Permitting child to walk to school unattended as contributory negligence of parents in action for injury or death of child. 62 ALR3d 541.